Hawaii statutes.
§329-126 Protections afforded to a treating
physician or advanced practice registered nurse. No physician or advanced
practice registered nurse shall be subject to arrest or prosecution, penalized
in any manner, or denied any right or privilege for providing written
certification for the medical use of marijuana for a qualifying patient;
provided that:

(1) The physician or advanced practice registered
nurse has diagnosed the patient as having a debilitating medical condition, as
defined in section 329-121;

(2) The physician or advanced practice registered
nurse has explained the potential risks and benefits of the medical use of
marijuana, as required under section 329-122;

(3) The written certification is based upon the
physician's or advanced practice registered nurse's professional opinion after
having completed a full assessment of the patient's medical history and current
medical condition made in the course of a bona fide physician-patient
relationship or bona fide advanced practice registered nurse-patient
relationship, as applicable; and

(4) The physician or advanced practice registered
nurse has complied with the registration requirements of section 329-123. [L
2000, c 228, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 230, §12]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next